District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.31

Application for benefits required.

(a)

Subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, the Mayor shall, as a condition of eligibility, require each public assistance applicant or recipient to apply for any benefits to which he or she may be eligible.

(b)

If a person applies for TANF and the Mayor determines that the applicant faces significant barriers to employment due to a physical or mental incapacity, the Mayor may consider the application to be an application for POWER, and may process the application as an application for POWER. A person may not apply for POWER without Mayoral approval.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 531, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(dd), 46 DCR 905
This section is referenced in § 4-205.30.
1981 Ed., § 3-205.31.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(dd) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(dd) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(dd) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(dd) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(dd) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).